Mississippi, session 2026, HB975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-32-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-32-29.  No person shall use any tobacco product or alternative nicotine product on any educational property as defined in Section 97-32-27.  Any * * *adult person who violates this section shall be subject to a fine and shall be liable as follows:  (a) for a first conviction, a warning; (b) for a second conviction, a fine of * * *Seventy‑five Dollars ($75.00) Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00); and (c) for all subsequent convictions, a fine not to exceed * * *One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) shall be imposed. Any adult found in violation of this section shall be issued a citation by a law enforcement officer, which citation shall include notice of the date, time and location for hearing before the justice court having jurisdiction where the violation is alleged to have occurred.  For the purposes of this section, "subsequent convictions" are for violations committed on any educational property within the State of Mississippi. Anyone convicted under this article shall be recorded as being fined for a civil violation of this article and not for violating a criminal statute. It is the responsibility of all law enforcement officers and law enforcement agencies of this state to ensure that the provisions of this article are enforced. SECTION 2.  Section 97-32-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-32-51.  (1)  For the purposes of this chapter: (a)  (i) "Alternative nicotine product" means: 1.  An electronic cigarette; 2.  Any other product that consists of or contains nicotine that can be ingested into the body by chewing, smoking, absorbing, dissolving, inhaling or by any other means; 3.  Any electronic device that can be used to deliver nicotine to an individual inhaling from the device, including, but not limited to, any cartridge component, liquid, capsule or powder used to refill or resupply such an electronic device; or 4. An electronic cigar or cigarillo. (ii)  Alternative nicotine product does not include: 1.  A cigarette or other tobacco product as defined in Section 97-32-3; 2.  A product that is a drug under 21 USCS 321(g)(1); 3.  A product that is a device under 21 USCS 321(h); or 4.  A combination product described in 21 USCS 353(g). (b)  (i) "Electronic cigarette" means an electronic product or device that produces a vapor that delivers nicotine or other substances to the person inhaling from the device to simulate smoking, and is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo or electronic pipe. (ii)  Electronic cigarette does not include: 1.  A cigarette or other tobacco products as defined in Section 97-32-3; 2.  A product that is a drug under 21 USCS 321(g)(1); 3.  A product that is a device under 21 USCS 321(h); or 4.  A combination product described in 21 USCS 353(g). (2)  No person, either directly or indirectly by an agent or employee, or by a vending machine owned by the person or located in the person's establishment, shall sell, offer for sale, give or furnish any alternative nicotine product, or any cartridge, component, liquid, capsule or powder thereof, to an individual under twenty-one (21) years of age.  The penalties described in this subsection shall be treble the fines described in this section, plus any other penalty provided by law, for the sale, use, possession or furnishing of a controlled substance or other substance to a person, if the alternative nicotine product contains any controlled substance that is otherwise prohibited by law, or any other substance that causes the recipient of such to require emergency medical care as a result of using the product.  Each violation of the provisions of this section shall be treated as a separate offense.  A violation of this subsection is punishable as follows: (a)  By a fine of * * *Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for a first offense; (b)  By a fine of * * *Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a second offense; and (c)  By a fine of * * *One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) for a third or subsequent offense. (3)  Before selling, offering for sale, giving or furnishing an alternative nicotine product, or any cartridge, component liquid, capsule or powder thereof, to an individual, a person shall verify that the individual is at least twenty-one (21) years of age by: (a)  Examining from any individual that appears to be under twenty-seven (27) years of age a government-issued photographic identification that establishes the individual is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; or (b)  For sales made through the Internet or other remote sales methods, performing an age verification through an independent, third-party age verification service that compares information available from public records to the personal information entered by the individual during the ordering process that establishes the individual is twenty-one (21) years of age or older. SECTION 3.  Section 37-9-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-9-71.  The superintendent of schools and the principal of a school shall have the power to suspend or expel a pupil for good cause, including misconduct in the school or on school property, as defined in Section 37-11-29, on the road to and from school, or at any school-related activity or event when such conduct by a pupil, in the determination of the superintendent or principal, renders that pupil's presence in the classroom a disruption to the educational environment of the school or a detriment to the best interest and welfare of the pupils and teacher of such class as a whole, or for any reason for which such pupil might be suspended, dismissed or expelled by the school board under state or federal law or any rule, regulation or policy of the local school district.  For any suspension of more than ten (10) days or expulsions, a student shall have the right to a due process hearing, be represented by legal counsel, to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses presented by the district.  The student and the student's parent, legal guardian or person in custody of the student may appeal suspension of more than ten (10) days and expulsions to the school board.  The standard of proof in all disciplinary proceedings shall be substantial evidence.  The parent or guardian of the child shall be advised of this right to a hearing by the appropriate superintendent or principal and the proper form shall be provided for requesting such a hearing. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.